Washington statutes.
RCW 1.16.040

"Folio."

The term "folio" when used as a measure for computing fees or compensation, shall be construed to mean one hundred words, counting every two figures necessarily used as a word. Any portion of a folio, when in the whole draft or paper there should not be a complete folio, and when there shall be an excess over the last folio exceeding a quarter, it shall be computed as a folio. The filing of a paper shall be construed to include the certificate of the same.

[Code 1881 s 2093; 1869 p 373 s 15; RRS s 500.]